Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-207 Marine and transportation
insurance defined. Marine and transportation insurance is:

(1) Insurance against any and all kinds of loss of or
damage to:

(A) Vessels, craft, aircraft, cars,
automobiles, and vehicles of every kind, as well as all goods, freights,
cargoes, merchandise, effects, disbursement, profits, moneys, bullion, precious
stones, securities, choses in action, evidences of debt, valuable papers,
bottomry and respondentia interests, and all other kinds of property and
interests therein, in respect to, appertaining to, or in connection with any
and all risks or perils of navigation, transit or transportation, including war
risks, on or under any seas or other waters, on land or in the air, or while
being assembled, packed, crated, baled, compressed, or similarly prepared for
shipment or while awaiting the same or during any delays, storage,
transshipment, or reshipment incident thereto, including marine builder's risks
and all personal property floater risks;

(B) Person or to property in connection with
or appertaining to a marine, inland marine, transit, or transportation
insurance, including liability for loss of or damage to either, arising out of
or in connection with the construction, repair, operation, maintenance, or use of
the subject matter of such insurance (but not including life insurance or
surety bonds nor insurance against loss by reason of bodily injury to the
person arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of automobiles);

(C) Precious stones, jewels, jewelry, gold,
silver, and other precious metals, whether used in business or trade or
otherwise and whether the same be in course of transportation or otherwise; and

(D) Bridges, tunnels and other
instrumentalities of transportation and communication (excluding buildings,
their furniture and furnishings, fixed contents and supplies held in storage)
unless fire, tornado, sprinkler leakage, hail, explosion, earthquake, riot, and
civil commotion are the only hazards to be covered; piers, wharves, docks, and slips,
excluding the risks of fire, tornado, sprinkler leakage, hail, explosion,
earthquake, riot, and civil commotion; other aids to navigation and
transportation, including drydocks and marine railways, against all risks.

(2) Marine protection and indemnity insurance,
meaning insurance against, or against legal liability of the insured for, loss,
damage or expense arising out of, or incident to, the ownership, operation,
chartering, maintenance, use, repair or construction of any vessel, craft or
instrumentality in use in ocean or inland waterways, including liability of the
insured for personal injury, illness or death or for loss of or damage to the
property of another person. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next